Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1584.01
Custodial care, defined.

Custodial care shall mean the continued observation, monitoring, and care of a facility for a minimum of one hundred years following the operational life of the facility and closure pursuant to the rules and regulations of the department.

Laws 1987, LB 426, § 5;

Laws 1996, LB 1201, § 6.